Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1344.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; WALKABOUTS PROGRAM GRANT.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Department of Education. new text end new text begin The sums indicated in this section are appropriated from the general fund to the Department of Education in the fiscal years designated. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Walkabouts program. new text end new text begin (a) For a grant to the regional centers of excellence to provide an evidence-based, standards-aligned, kinesthetic learning platform using physical activity to teach math, English, language arts, and literacy standards for prekindergarten through grade 5 to improve academic performance and social-emotional learning: new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 500,000 new text end new text begin ..... new text end new text begin 2026 new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 500,000 new text end new text begin ..... new text end new text begin 2027 new text end new text begin (b) The regional centers of excellence must provide the ActivEd Walkabouts program at no cost to schools. A school must apply for participation in the program in the form and manner determined by the regional centers of excellence. To the extent practicable, the regional centers of excellence must select schools that are identified for support under the state accountability system and that are geographically distributed equitably throughout the state. new text end new text begin (c) The base for fiscal year 2028 and later is $0. new text end